Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2009
Jurors; oath; form.

When all challenges have been made, the following oath shall be administered: You shall well and truly try, and true deliverance make, between the State of Nebraska and the prisoner at the bar (giving his name), so help you God.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 471, p. 827;

R.S.1913, § 9112;

C.S.1922, § 10137;

C.S.1929, § 29-2009;

R.S.1943, § 29-2009.

Trial court's journal entry reciting jury was sworn imports verity absent contrary proof. State v. Martin, 198 Neb. 811, 255 N.W.2d 844 (1977).

It is the duty of jury to endeavor to agree upon verdict; agreement by them to evade such duty is violation of oath. Green v. State, 10 Neb. 102, 4 N.W. 422 (1880).

Where record states that jury was sworn "to well and truly try and true deliverance make upon the issue joined between the parties," it is presumed that oath was administered in statutory form. Smith v. State, 4 Neb. 277 (1876).